Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB37.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6105(b) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6105. Persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms.* * *(b) Enumerated offenses.--The following offenses shall apply to subsection (a):Section 908 (relating to prohibited offensive weapons).Section 911 (relating to corrupt organizations).Section 912 (relating to possession of weapon on school property).Section 913(a)(2) (relating to possession of firearm or other dangerous weapon in court facility).12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2502 (relating to murder).Section 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter).Section 2504 (relating to involuntary manslaughter), if the offense is based on the reckless use of a firearm.Section 2604 (relating to murder of unborn child).Section 2605 (relating to voluntary manslaughter of unborn child).Section 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).Section 2703 (relating to assault by prisoner).Section 2704 (relating to assault by life prisoner).Section 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person), if the reckless conduct engaged in involved a firearm.Section 2706 (relating to terroristic threats), if the threat communicated referenced the use of a firearm.Section 2709.1 (relating to stalking).Section 2715 (relating to threat to use weapons of mass destruction).Section 2716 (relating to weapons of mass destruction).Section 2717 (relating to terrorism).Section 2901 (relating to kidnapping).Section 2902 (relating to unlawful restraint).Section 2903 (relating to false imprisonment), if a firearm is used in the commission of the offense.Section 2910 (relating to luring a child into a motor vehicle or structure).Section 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals).Section 3121 (relating to rape).Section 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault).Section 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual 20250SB0037PN0017 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intercourse).Section 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).Section 3124.2 (relating to institutional sexual assault).Section 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).Section 3126 (relating to indecent assault).Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).Section 3302 (relating to causing or risking catastrophe).Section 3502 (relating to burglary).Section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass), if the offense is graded a felony of the second degree or higher.Section 3701 (relating to robbery).Section 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).Section 3921 (relating to theft by unlawful taking or disposition) upon conviction of the second felony offense.Section 3923 (relating to theft by extortion) when the offense is accompanied by threats of violence.Section 3925 (relating to receiving stolen property) upon conviction of the second felony offense.Section 4702 (relating to threats and other improper influence in official and political matters), if the threat involved the use of a firearm.Section 4703 (relating to retaliation for past official action), if the crime involved the use of a firearm.Section 4906 (relating to false reports to law enforcement authorities), if the fictitious report involved the theft of a firearm as provided in section 4906(c)(2).Section 4912 (relating to impersonating a public servant), if the person is impersonating a law enforcement 20250SB0037PN0017 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 officer.Section 4915.1 (relating to failure to comply with registration requirements).Section 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).Section 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).Section 4953.1 (relating to retaliation against prosecutor or judicial official).Section 5104.1 (relating to disarming law enforcement officer).Section 5121 (relating to escape).Section 5122 (relating to weapons or implements for escape).Section 5501(3) (relating to riot).Section 5515 (relating to prohibiting of paramilitary training).Section 5516 (relating to facsimile weapons of mass destruction).Section 6110.1 (relating to possession of firearm by minor).Section 6110.2 (relating to possession of firearm with altered manufacturer's number).Section 6117 (relating to altering or obliterating marks of identification).Section 6121 (relating to certain bullets prohibited).Section 6301 (relating to corruption of minors).Section 6302 (relating to sale or lease of weapons and explosives).Section 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).20250SB0037PN0017 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6318 (relating to unlawful contact with minor).Section 6319 (relating to solicitation of minors to traffic drugs).Section 6320 (relating to sexual exploitation of children).Any offense equivalent to any of the above-enumerated offenses under the prior laws of this Commonwealth or any offense equivalent to any of the above-enumerated offenses under the statutes of any other state or of the United States.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0037PN0017 - 5 - 123456789101112